Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 8 Offenses Against Registration and Certificate of Title Laws

31-8-1.
Operation of vehicles without evidences of registration.

No person shall operate, nor shall an owner knowingly permit to be operated, upon any highway or bicycle trail or path, any vehicle required to be registered pursuant to this title unless there has been issued for it a valid registration card and unless there is attached to it and displayed on it, when and as required by chapters 3 — 9 of this title, a valid registration plate or plates issued for it by the division of motor vehicles for the current registration year except as otherwise expressly permitted in those chapters. Any violation of this section shall be punishable by a fine of eighty-five dollars ($85.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 13, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-8-2

; G.L. 1956, §

31-8-1

; P.L. 1971, ch. 101, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 81, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 413, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 12, § 14.

31-8-1.1.
Operation of beach vehicle without permit.

No person shall operate, nor shall an owner knowingly permit to be operated, upon a beach as defined by the coastal resources management council, any vehicle required to be registered by the coastal resources management council unless there has been issued a valid beach registration permit and unless there is attached on it and displayed on it a valid registration sticker issued by the coastal resources management council for the current registration year. Any violation of this section shall be punishable by a fine of not less that twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than seventy-five dollars ($75.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 306, § 1.

31-8-2.
Operation of vehicle when registration canceled, suspended, or revoked.

No person shall operate, nor shall an owner knowingly permit to be operated, upon any highway, a motor vehicle the registration of which has been canceled, suspended, or revoked. Any violation of this section is a civil violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 101, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 6, § 3.

31-8-3.
Improper use of evidences of registration or certificate of title.

No person shall lend to another any certificate of title, registration card, registration plate, special plate, or permit issued to him or her if the person desiring to borrow it would not be entitled to its use. Nor shall any person knowingly permit its use by one not so entitled. Nor shall any person display upon a vehicle any registration plate or permit not issued for that vehicle or not otherwise lawfully used on it under chapters 3 — 9 of this title. Any violation of this section is a civil violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 13, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-8-3

; P.L. 1971, ch. 101, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 6, § 3.

31-8-4.
Suspension or revocation of registration or certificate of title.

The division of motor vehicles is authorized to suspend or revoke the registration of a vehicle or a certificate of title, registration card, or registration plate, or any nonresident or other permit, in any of the following events:

When the division of motor vehicles is satisfied that the registration or that the certificate, card, plate, or permit was fraudulently or erroneously issued;

When the division of motor vehicles determines that a registered vehicle is mechanically unfit or unsafe to be operated or moved upon the highways;

When a registered vehicle has been dismantled or wrecked;

When the division of motor vehicles determines that the required fee has not been paid and the fee is not paid upon reasonable notice and demand;

When a registration plate or permit is knowingly displayed upon a vehicle other than the one for which issued;

When the division of motor vehicles determines that the owner has committed any offense under chapters 3 — 9 of this title involving the registration or the certificate, card, plate, or permit to be suspended or revoked;

When the division of motor vehicles is so authorized under any other provision of law; or

Upon receipt of notice the carrier and/or operator of a commercial motor vehicle has violated or is not in compliance with 49 C.F.R. 386.72 or 49 C.F.R. 390.5 et seq. of the motor carrier safety regulations or chapter 23 of this title.

Upon removal of cause for which the registration or certificate of title was revoked, denied, or suspended, the division of motor vehicles shall require the registrant or applicant to pay a restoration fee of two hundred and fifty dollars ($250), provided that no restoration fee shall be required if the revocation, denial, or suspension was issued pursuant to subsection (a)(2) of this section, §§

31-38-2

,

31-38-3

,

31-38-4

, or

31-47.1-3

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 13, § 5; P.L. 1952, ch. 2937, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-8-5

; G.L. 1956, §

31-8-4

; P.L. 1971, ch. 101, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 382, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 275, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 9, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 8, § 4.

31-8-5.
Suspension or revocation of certificate or special plates of manufacturer, transporter, or dealer.

The division of motor vehicles is also authorized to suspend or revoke a certificate or the special plates issued to a manufacturer, bailee, or dealer upon determining that this person is not lawfully entitled to it; has made or knowingly permitted any illegal use of those plates; has committed fraud in the registration of vehicles; or has failed to give notices of transfers when and as required by chapters 3 — 9 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 13, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-8-6

; G.L. 1956, §

31-8-5

; P.L. 1971, ch. 101, § 1.

31-8-6.
Owner to return evidences of registration upon cancellation, suspension, or revocation.

Whenever the division of motor vehicles as authorized pursuant to this title cancels, suspends, or revokes the registration of a vehicle, or a certificate of title, registration card or registration plate or plates, or any nonresident or other permit, or the license of any dealer or wrecker, that registration, certificate, or permit shall be invalid and the owner or person in possession of it shall immediately return the evidences of registration, title, or license so canceled, suspended or revoked to the division of motor vehicles. If the owner or person in possession fails to return it the division of motor vehicles may immediately direct any peace officer to secure possession of it and to return it to the division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 13, § 7; P.L. 1954, ch. 3277, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-8-7

; G.L. 1956, §

31-8-6

; P.L. 1971, ch. 101, § 1.

31-8-7.
[Omitted.]